Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2317YH (4) 91 jda/jh H.F. 275 Section 1. Section 256C.3, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. Provision for ensuring that if there 3 is a waiting list for eligible children to enroll in the 4 local program, that the local program gives priority on the 5 waiting list to eligible children who meet the definitional 6 requirements of the term âhomeless individualâ under 42 U.S.C. 7 Â§11302(a) and (c), consistent with the requirements established 8 under paragraph âaâ . 9